Utah statutes.
17B-1-303.   Term of board of trustees members -- Oath of office -- Bond.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the term of each member of a
board of trustees shall begin at noon on the January 1 following the member's
election or appointment.
(b)  The term of each member of the initial board of trustees of a newly
created local district shall begin:
(i)  upon appointment, for an appointed member; and
(ii)  upon the member taking the oath of office after the canvass of the
election at which the member is elected, for an elected member.
(2) (a) (i)  Subject to Subsection (2)(a)(ii), the term of each member of a
board of trustees shall be four years, except that approximately half the
members of the initial board of trustees, chosen by lot, shall serve a two-
year term so that the term of approximately half the board members expires
every two years.
(ii) (A)  If the terms of members of the initial board of trustees of a newly
created local district do not begin on the first Monday of January because of
application of Subsection (1)(b), the terms of those members shall be adjusted
as necessary, subject to Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(B), to result in the terms of
their successors complying with:
(I)  the requirement under Subsection (1)(a) for a term to begin on the first
Monday of January; and
(II)  the requirement under Subsection (2)(a)(i) that terms be four years.
(B)  An adjustment under Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(A) may not add more than a year
to or subtract more than a year from a member's term.
(b)  Each board of trustees member shall serve until a successor is duly
elected or appointed and qualified, unless the member earlier is removed from
office or resigns or otherwise leaves office.
(c)  If a member of a board of trustees no longer meets the qualifications of
Subsection 17B-1-302(1):
(i)  the member's position is considered vacant, subject to Subsection
(2)(c)(ii); and
(ii)  the member may continue to serve until a successor is duly elected or
appointed and qualified.
(3) (a) (i)  Before entering upon the duties of office, each member of a board
of trustees shall take the oath of office specified in Utah Constitution
Article IV, Section 10.
(ii)  An oath of office may be administered by a judge, county clerk, notary
public, or the local district clerk.
(b)  Each oath of office shall be filed with the clerk of the local district.
(c)  The failure of a board of trustees member to take the oath required by
Subsection (3)(a) does not invalidate any official act of that member.
(4)  A board of trustees member is not limited in the number of terms the
member may serve.
(5)  Except as provided in Subsection (6), each midterm vacancy in a board of
trustees position shall be filled as provided in Section 20A-1-512.
(6) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (6):
(i)  "Appointed official" means a person who:
(A)  is appointed as a member of a local district board of trustees by a
county or municipality entitled to appoint a member to the board; and
(B)  holds an elected position with the appointing county or municipality.
(ii)  "Appointing entity" means the county or municipality that appointed the
appointed official to the board of trustees.
(b)  The board of trustees shall declare a midterm vacancy for the board
position held by an appointed official if:
(i)  during the appointed official's term on the board of trustees, the
appointed official ceases to hold the elected position with the appointing
entity; and
(ii)  the appointing entity submits a written request to the board to declare
the vacancy.
(c)  Upon the board's declaring a midterm vacancy under Subsection (6)(b), the
appointing entity shall appoint another person to fill the remaining unexpired
term on the board of trustees.
(7) (a)  Each member of a board of trustees shall give a bond for the faithful
performance of the member's duties, in the amount and with the sureties
prescribed by the board of trustees.
(b)  The local district shall pay the cost of each bond required under
Subsection (7)(a).
